en: Pulleys\, Blocks & Sheaves
xx: Pulleys\, Blocks & Sheaves
cs: Kladky\, bloky a svazky
da: Taljer\, blokke og tovskiver
de: Flaschenzüge & Rollen
es: Poleas
fr: Poulies\, palans et réas
it: Pulegge\, bozzelli e dischi
ja: 滑車・ロープ車
nl: Katrollen\, blokken en schijven
no: Trinser og blokkskiver
pl: Krążki linowe\, zblocza i wielokrążki
pt: Roldanas\, blocos e polias
ru: Ролики\, блоки и шкивы
sv: Drivtrissa\, block och blockskiva
tr: Makaralar\, Bloklar ve Kasnaklar

en: Winches
xx: Winches
cs: Navijáky
da: Kabeltræk
de: Seilwinden
es: Cabrestantes
fr: Treuils
it: Argani
ja: ウィンチ類
nl: Lieren
no: Vinsjer
pl: Wyciągarki
pt: Guinchos
ru: Лебёдки
sv: Vinschar
tr: Vinçler

en: Pallets & Loading Platforms
xx: Pallets & Loading Platforms
cs: Palety a nakládací plošiny
da: Paller og læsseplatforme
de: Paletten & Ladeflächen
es: Plataformas de carga y palés
fr: Palettes et plates-formes de chargement
it: Pianali di carico e pallet
ja: パレット・荷台
nl: Pallets en laadplatforms
no: Paller
pl: Palety i platformy załadowcze
pt: Plataformas de carga e pallets
ru: Паллеты и погрузочные платформы
sv: Pall- och lastningsplattformar
tr: Paletler ve Yükleme Platformları

en: Medical
xx: Medical
cs: Zdravotnictví
da: Medicinsk
de: Medizinischer Bereich
es: Productos médicos
fr: Secteur médical
it: Medicina
ja: 医療
nl: Medisch
no: Medisin
pl: Branża medyczna
pt: Medicina
ru: Медицина
sv: Sjukvård
tr: Medikal

en: Hospital Curtains
xx: Hospital Curtains
cs: Nemocniční závěsy
da: Hospitalsgardiner
de: Krankenhaus-Vorhänge
es: Cortinas de hospital
fr: Rideaux d'hôpitaux, Rideau d'hôpitaux, Rideau d'hôpital, Rideaux d'hôpital
it: Tende ospedaliere
ja: 医療施設用カーテン
nl: Ziekenhuisgordijnen
no: Sykehusgardiner
pl: Zasłony szpitalne
pt: Cortinas hospitalares
ru: Больничные занавески
sv: Sjukhusdraperier
tr: Hastane Perdeleri

en: Hospital Gowns
xx: Hospital Gowns
cs: Nemocniční oblečení
da: Hospitalskapper
de: Krankenhausbekleidung
es: Batas de hospital
fr: Blouses d'hôpital
it: Camici da ospedale
ja: 検診衣・患者衣
nl: Ziekenhuisjasjes
no: Sykehusskjorter
pl: Fartuchy lekarskie
pt: Avental hospitalar
ru: Больничные халаты
sv: Patientrockar
tr: Hasta Önlükleri

en: Medical Bedding
xx: Medical Bedding
cs: Zdravotnické lůžkoviny
da: Sengetøj til hospitaler
de: Medizinische Bettwäsche
es: Ropa de cama médica
fr: Literie médicale
it: Biancheria da letto medica
ja: 医療寝具
nl: Medisch bedlinnen
no: Medisinsk sengetøy
pl: Pościel szpitalna
pt: Roupa de cama hospitalar
ru: Медицинское бельё
sv: Sängkläder för sjukvård
tr: Medikal Yatak Takımları

en: Medical Equipment
xx: Medical Equipment
cs: Zdravotnické vybavení
da: Medicinsk udstyr
de: Medizinische Geräte
es: Equipo médico
fr: Équipement médical
it: Apparecchiature mediche
ja: 医療機器
nl: Medische apparatuur
no: Medisinsk utstyr
pl: Sprzęt medyczny
pt: Equipamento médico
ru: Медицинское оборудование
sv: Medicinsk utrustning
tr: Medikal Ekipmanlar

en: Automated External Defibrillators
xx: Automated External Defibrillators
cs: Automatické externí defibrilátory
da: Automatiske eksterne defibrillatorer
de: Automatisierte externe Defibrillatoren
es: Desfibriladores externos automatizados
fr: Défibrillateurs externes automatisés
it: Defibrillatori esterni automatici
ja: AED
nl: Automatische externe defibrillatoren
no: Automatiske eksterne defibrillatorer
pl: Automatyczne defibrylatory zewnętrzne
pt: Desfibriladores externos automáticos
ru: Автоматические наружные дефибрилляторы
sv: Automatiska externa defibrillatorer
tr: Otomatik Harici Defibrilatörler

en: Gait Belts
xx: Gait Belts
cs: Zdravotnické popruhy
da: Gangbælter
de: Medizinische Hebegürtel
es: Cinturones de traslado
fr: Ceintures de transfert
it: Cinture per deambulazione
ja: 介助ベルト
nl: Tilbanden
no: Forflytningsbelter
pl: Pasy transportowe
pt: Cinto para transferência de paciente
ru: Пояса для перемещения пациентов
sv: Lyftbälten
tr: Yürüyüş Kemerleri

en: Medical Reflex Hammers & Tuning Forks
xx: Medical Reflex Hammers & Tuning Forks
cs: Reflexní kladívka
da: Reflekshammere
de: Reflexhämmer
es: Martillo de reflejos y diapasones
fr: Marteaux à réflexes et diapasons
it: Diapason e martelletti per riflessi
ja: 打診器
nl: Reflexhamers
no: Reflekshammere og stemmegafler
pl: Młotki neurologiczne
pt: Martelos de reflexo
ru: Неврологические молотки
sv: Reflexhammare
tr: Refleks Çekiçleri ve Ses Çatalları

en: Medical Stretchers & Gurneys
xx: Medical Stretchers & Gurneys
cs: Zdravotnická nosítka a pojízdná lůžka
da: Bårer
de: Tragen
es: Camillas médicas con y sin ruedas
fr: Brancards et civières
it: Lettighe e barelle
ja: 医療用担架・ストレッチャー
nl: Brancards
no: Bårer og pasienttraller
pl: Nosze ręczne i nosze na kółkach
pt: Macas e camas hospitalares
ru: Медицинские носилки и тележки
sv: Sjukbårar
tr: Tıbbi Sedyeler

en: Otoscopes & Ophthalmoscopes
xx: Otoscopes & Ophthalmoscopes
cs: Otoskopy a oftalmoskopy
da: Otoskoper og oftalmoskoper
de: Otoskope & Ophthalmoskope
es: Otoscopios y oftalmoscopios
fr: Otoscopes et ophtalmoscopes
it: Otoscopi e oftalmoscopi
ja: 耳鏡・検眼鏡
nl: Otoscopen en oftalmoscopen
no: Otoskoper og oftalmoskoper
pl: Otoskopy i oftalmoskopy
pt: Otoscópios e oftalmoscópios
ru: Отоскопы и офтальмоскопы
sv: Otoskop och oftalmoskop
tr: Otoskoplar ve Oftalmaskoplar

en: Patient Lifts
xx: Patient Lifts
cs: Zařízení pro zvedání pacientů
da: Patientlifte
de: Patientenlifter
es: Grúas ortopédicas
fr: Lève-personnes
it: Sollevatori per pazienti
ja: 介護用リフト
nl: Patiëntenliften
no: Pasientløftere
pl: Podnośniki pacjenta
pt: Elevador de pacientes
ru: Медицинские подъёмники
sv: Patienthissar
tr: Hasta Kaldırıcılar

en: Stethoscopes
xx: Stethoscopes
cs: Stetoskopy
da: Stetoskoper
de: Stethoskope
es: Estetoscopios
fr: Stéthoscopes
it: Stetoscopi
ja: 聴診器
nl: Stethoscopen
no: Stetoskoper
pl: Stetoskopy
pt: Estetoscópios
ru: Стетоскопы
sv: Stetoskop
tr: Stetoskoplar

en: Vital Signs Monitor Accessories
xx: Vital Signs Monitor Accessories
cs: Monitory životních funkcí – příslušenství
da: Tilbehør til skærme til patientovervågning
de: Zubehör für Vitaldatenmonitore
es: Accesorios para monitores de constantes vitales
fr: Accessoires pour moniteurs de signes vitaux
it: Accessori per monitor di parametri vitali
ja: 生体情報モニタ関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor vitale tekenen-monitor
no: Tilbehør til pasientmonitorer
pl: Akcesoria do monitorów oznak życiowych
pt: Acessórios para monitores de sinais vitais
ru: Принадлежности для мониторов показателей жизнедеятельности
sv: Tillbehör till vitalparametermätare
tr: Yaşamsal Belirti Monitörü Aksesuarları

en: Vital Signs Monitors
xx: Vital Signs Monitors
cs: Monitory životních funkcí
da: Skærme til patientovervågning
de: Vitaldatenmonitore
es: Monitores de constantes vitales
fr: Moniteurs de signes vitaux
it: Monitor per i segni vitali
ja: 生体情報モニタ
nl: Medische bewakingsmonitor
no: Pasientmonitorer
pl: Monitory oznak życiowych
pt: Monitores de sinais vitais
ru: Мониторы показателей жизнедеятельности
sv: Vitalparametermätare
tr: Yaşamsal Belirti Monitörleri

en: Medical Furniture
xx: Medical Furniture
cs: Lékařský nábytek
da: Møbler til hospitaler og læger
de: Medizinische Möbel
es: Mobiliario médico
fr: Meubles pour le secteur médical
it: Arredamento medico
ja: 医療用家具
nl: Medisch meubilair
no: Medisinske møbler
pl: Meble medyczne
pt: Móveis médicos
ru: Медицинская мебель
sv: Sjukhusmöbler
tr: Medikal Mobilyalar

en: Chiropractic Tables
xx: Chiropractic Tables
cs: Lehátka pro chiropraxi
da: Kiropraktorborde
de: Chiropraktische Tische
es: Mesas quiroprácticas
fr: Tables de chiropractie
it: Lettini da chiropratica
ja: カイロプラクティック施術台
nl: Chiropractortafels
no: Kiropraktiske bord
pl: Stoły do chiropraktyki
pt: Mesas para quiroprático
ru: Столы для хиропрактики
sv: Kiropraktikbord
tr: Kiropraktik Tedavi Masaları

en: Examination Chairs & Tables
xx: Examination Chairs & Tables
cs: Vyšetřovací křesla a stoly
da: Undersøgelsesstole- og borde
de: Untersuchungsstühle & -tische
es: Camillas y sillas para reconocimiento
fr: Fauteuils et tables d'examen
it: Poltrone e lettini per visite
ja: 診察台
nl: Onderzoeksstoelen en -tafels
no: Undersøkelsesstoler og -bord
pl: Fotele i stoły do badań lekarskich
pt: Cadeiras e mesas para exames
ru: Смотровые кресла и столы
sv: Undersökningsstolar och -bord
tr: Muayene Sandalyeleri ve Masaları